Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.220

Acting without certificate, license, or registration—Penalty.

Any person acting as a state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser or state-registered appraiser trainee without a certificate, license, or registration that is currently valid is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2005 c 339 s 18; 1996 c 182 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.

Effective dates—1996 c 182: See note following RCW 18.140.005.